South Dakota, session 2026, SB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-9-5 be AMENDED:
11-9-5. To establish create a district, the governing body must adopt a resolution
that:
(1) Describes the boundaries of a the district with sufficient definiteness to identify
with ordinary and reasonable certainty the territory included. The boundaries may
not split a whole unit of property that is being used for a single purpose;
(2) Creates the district on a given date;
(3) Includes a finding that the assessed value of the taxable property in the district,
plus the tax increment base of all other existing districts, does not exceed ten two
and one-half percent of the total assessed value of all taxable property in the
political subdivision; and
(4) Assigns a name to the district for identification purposes. The first district created
in each political subdivision must be known as "Tax Increment Financing District
Number One, City (or Town, or County) of __________." Each subsequently
created district must be assigned the next consecutive number.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.